test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-piehain_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - piehâin: # 1Bj á-stems
    piehâin+N+Sg+Nom: piehâin
    piehâin+N+Sg+Gen: piehâin
    piehâin+N+Sg+Acc: piehâin
    piehâin+N+Sg+Ill: pieˊhânjân
    piehâin+N+Sg+Loc: pieˊhânjist
    piehâin+N+Sg+Com: pieˊhânjáin
    piehâin+N+Sg+Abe: piehâinttáá
    piehâin+N+Ess: pieˊhânjin
    piehâin+N+Par: pieˊhânjid
    piehâin+N+Pl+Nom: pieˊhânjeh
    piehâin+N+Pl+Gen: pieˊhânjij
    piehâin+N+Pl+Acc: pieˊhânjijd
    piehâin+N+Pl+Ill: pieˊhânjáid
    piehâin+N+Pl+Loc: pieˊhânjijn
    piehâin+N+Pl+Com: pieˊhânjijguin
    piehâin+N+Pl+Abe: pieˊhânjijttáá
    
    
